Hawaii statutes.
§39-34 Disputed ownership. If
there are two or more claimants claiming adversely, each to the other or
others, to be the holder in due course of the bonds or coupons alleged to have
been lost, wholly or partially destroyed, defaced, or stolen, the director of
finance, in the director of finance's discretion, may require the claimants, if
not within the State, to appoint agents within the State to accept service of
process, or otherwise to submit to the jurisdiction of the courts of the State,
and may bring suit on behalf of the State in the circuit court of the first
judicial circuit, against the claimants, by interpleader, for the determination
of the claimant or claimants entitled to the payment of the bonds or coupons.
Jurisdiction is hereby conferred upon the court to hear and determine, without
a jury, the suits and to determine whether any of the claimants are entitled to
the payment, and, if so, which of the claimants is so entitled; provided that
the determination shall not dispense with the requirement of the giving of a
bond, before the payment of the claims. The costs of the suit shall be borne
by the claimants, and the court may decree the payment of the costs by any of
the unsuccessful claimants, or the apportionment thereof, as may be deemed
just. The decision of the court shall be appealable to the supreme court. [L
1988, c 28, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next